apertium-mag.mag.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Magahi

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      Noun
# <v>      Verb
# <adj>    Adjective
# <adv>    Adverb
# <post>   Postposition
# <cnj>    Conjunction
# <det>    Determiner

# Noun Cases 
# <loc>    Locative
# <ins>    Instrumental
# <obl>    Oblique. same as nominative except context

# Verb Forms
# <hab>    Habitual
# <impf>   Imperfective
# <perf>   Perfective
# <inf>    Infinitive

# Verb Endings
# <prs>    Present Subjunctive
# <past>   Simple Past
# <pis>    Imperfect Subjunctive
# <fut>    Future
# <pres>   Present
# <fts>    Future Subjunctive
# <s_p1>   Singular First Person
# <s_p2>   Singular Second Person
# <s_p3>   Singular Third Person
# <o_p2>   Second Person Singular Object
# <o_p3>   Third Person Singular Object
# <hi>     High Courtesy
# <low>    Low Courtesy

# <sent>   Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   Hyphen
# <cm>     Comma
# <apos>   Apostrophe
# <quot>   Quotation mark
# <lquot>  Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     Plural
# <sg>     Singular

# Pronouns and related adverbs
# pronouns
# <prn>    Pronoun
# <pers>   Personal
# <dem>    Demonstrative
# <attr>   Attributive (like "this" in "this cat", "that cat", "which cat", etc.)
# <rel>    Relative
# <cor>    Correlative
# relatives and correlatives are a fairly unique feature of indo aryan languages. It's easiest to explain with an example. In the sentence "The girl _with whom_ you are speaking, _she_ is my sister", _with whom_ is a relative pronoun, and _she_ is a correlative pronoun
# For a magahi example, consider "जे लडिका दौड है, से हमर भऐ है" ("je laṛikā dauṛ hai, se hamar bhāi hai"), literally "relative boy run is, correlative mine brother is", or "the boy who is running is my brother"
# <refl> Reflexive (like "my own", "my self", "own time", etc.)
# <all> All (like "all time" "everyone" etc.)

# adverbs
# <quan>   Quantitative (this much, that much, how much, etc.)
# <adjv>   Adjectival (I think like "its", "whose", etc.)
# <adv>    Adverb
# <man>    Manner adverb (in this way, in that way, in which way, etc.)
# <pla>    Place adverb (here, there, etc.)
# <time>   Time adverb (now, then, when, etc.)

# Other symbols
# >        Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Punctuation

[ <aux>:H ] [ <v>: ] AuxTense [ <tv>:k ]? Subject ObjectHonorific?
[ <aux><v><pp>:Howa ]
[ <aux><v><past><impf>:Hue ]
[ <aux><v><past><perf>:Hiyai ]

Postposition* VerbRoot+ [ <v>: ] Tense [ <tv>:k ]? Subject ObjectHonorific?
Postposition* VerbRoot+ [ <v>: ] [ <tv>:k ]? Aspect [ <tv>:ka ]?
Postposition* VerbRoot+ [ <v>: ] Tense [ <inf>:e ]
Postposition* VerbRoot+ [ <v>: ] [ <pp>:tā ]
Postposition* VerbRoot+ [ <v>: ] [ <pp>:ta ]
Postposition* VerbRoot+ [ <n>:iyā ]

Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <n>: ] Case [ <def>:>{W}ā ]? Number?
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <n>: ] Case [ <def>:>ā{W} ]? Number?
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:ī ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:iyā ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:īya ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:īyā ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:tika ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:yika ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:yaka ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:yakār ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ <adj>:ika ]
Adjectives* Postposition* NounRoot+ [ :> ] VerbRoot [ <v>: ] 

PersonalPronoun
Pronoun
[ prn<prn>: ] OtherParadigms OtherParadigmsDeclension
[ prn<prn><indef><attr>:kauno ]
[ prn<prn><indef><attr>:kaun ]			# Dir/LR
[ prn<prn><indef><num>:kuch ]
[ prn<prn><indef><quant>:kuch ]
[ prn<prn><cor><pla>:yātrā ]
Postposition [ <post>: ]
[ :nā ]? Adjectives [ <adj>: ]
Adverbs [ <adv>: ]
Conjunctions [ <cnj>: ]
Determiners [ <det>: ]
Interjection [ <ij>: ]
Numbers+ [ <num>: ]
Url [ <url>: ]

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N ###
###############################################################################
# ā ū ṃ ī ṛ ś ṣ ṭ ṇ
